Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 5
POLLING PLACE SUPPLIES AND EQUIPMENT

1-5-501. Sufficient voting booths, voting machines, or electronic voting equipment.

At all elections in political subdivisions that use paper ballots, the governing body shall provide in each polling location a sufficient number of voting booths. Each voting booth shall be situated so as to permit eligible electors to prepare their ballots screened from observation and shall be furnished with supplies and conveniences necessary for voting.

At all elections in political subdivisions that use electronic or electromechanical voting systems, the designated election official shall supply each polling location with sufficient voting equipment.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 716, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1344, § 7, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 712, § 43, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-501 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-502. Ballot boxes for nonmachine voting.

The governing body of each political subdivision using paper ballots or electronic vote counting equipment shall provide at least one ballot box for each polling location. The ballot boxes shall be strongly constructed so as to prevent tampering, with a small opening at the top and with a lid to be locked. The designated election official shall keep the ballot boxes and keys and deliver them, prior to the date on which the polling locations open, to the election judges.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 716, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 586, § 25, effective April 30.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 774, § 48, effective May 20.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 712, § 44, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-502 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For delivery of election returns, ballot boxes, and other election papers, see § 1-7-701.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-503. Arrangement of voting equipment or voting booths and ballot boxes.

The voting equipment or voting booths and the ballot box shall be situated in the polling location so as to be in plain view of the election officials and watchers. No person other than the election officials and those admitted for the purpose of voting are permitted within the immediate voting area, which is considered as within six feet of the voting equipment or voting booths and the ballot box, except by authority of the election judges or the designated election official, and then only when necessary to keep order and enforce the law.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1344, § 8, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 712, § 45, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-503 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-504. Instruction cards.

The designated election official of each political subdivision shall furnish to the election judges a sufficient number of instruction cards for the guidance of eligible electors in preparing their ballots. The election judges shall post at least one of the cards in each polling location. The cards shall be printed in large, clear type and shall contain full instructions to the eligible electors as to what should be done:

To obtain ballots for voting;

To prepare the ballots for deposit in the ballot box;

To obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake;

To obtain assistance in marking ballots; and

To vote for a write-in candidate.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

IP (1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 712, § 46, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-504 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (1) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-504.5. Items to be posted at polling locations.

The following items shall be posted at each polling location:

A polling location sign visible from the outside of the closest entrance to the polling location pursuant to section 1-5-106;

A sign notifying persons outside and inside of the polling location that no electioneering is permitted within one hundred feet of the polling location pursuant to section 1-13-714;

Instruction cards for the guidance of eligible electors pursuant to section 1-5-504;

Sample ballots pursuant to section 1-5-413;

An explanation of the procedures that govern the provision of voting assistance to electors with disabilities who require such assistance pursuant to section 1-7-111. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to prescribe the form of such explanation.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1744, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(e) added, p. 1086, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2013:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 713, § 47, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-505. Election expenses to be paid by county.

Except as provided in section 1-5-505.5, the cost of conducting general, primary, and congressional vacancy elections, including the cost of printing and supplies, shall be a county charge, the payment of which shall be provided for in the same manner as the payment of other county expenses.

For a special legislative election, if the state senatorial or state representative district in which the special legislative election is to be held is comprised of one or more whole counties or a part of one county and all or a part of one or more other counties, the cost of conducting a special legislative election, including the cost of printing and supplies, shall be a county charge of the county in which there were irregularities in the votes cast or counted at the general election for such district.

If the state senatorial or state representative district in which the special election is to be held is comprised of a portion of one county, the cost of conducting a special legislative election, including the cost of printing and supplies, shall be a county charge of such county.

The payment of such costs of a special legislative election shall be provided for in the same manner as the payment of other county expenses.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1389, § 9, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 655, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-505 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For payment of county expenses, see part 1 of article 25 of title 30.

1-5-505.5. State reimbursement to counties for ballot measure elections.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Ballot issue" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1-1-104 (2.3).

"Ballot question" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1-1-104 (2.7).

For an election held in an odd-numbered year pursuant to article 41 of this title in which the only item on the ballot of a particular county is a state ballot issue, the state shall reimburse such county for the costs incurred that are shown by such county to be directly attributable to conducting such election and shall not include any portion of the usual costs of maintaining the office of the clerk and recorder, including, without limitation, overhead costs and personal service costs of permanent employees.

For any other odd- or even-numbered year election in which a state ballot issue or state ballot question is on the ballot of a particular county, the state shall reimburse such county for the cost of the duties performed by the county clerk and recorder that relate to conducting the election on the ballot issue or ballot question; except that the reimbursement shall be set at the following rates:

For counties with ten thousand or fewer active registered electors, ninety cents for each active registered elector as of the time of the election;

For counties with more than ten thousand active registered electors, eighty cents for each active registered elector as of the time of the election.

The general assembly shall make appropriations to the department of state from the department of state cash fund or from the general fund for the purpose of reimbursing counties under the terms of this section in conformity with section 24-21-104.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 655, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 2032, § 10, effective June 6.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1143), ch. 231, p. 1014, § 1, effective May 29.

1-5-506. Election expenses in nonpartisan elections.

The cost of conducting a nonpartisan election, including the cost of printing and supplies, must be paid by the governing body calling the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1413, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1085, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 580, § 42, effective May 18.

1-5-507. County clerk and recorder to give estimate.

In any election called by a nonpartisan governing body where the county clerk and recorder will have responsibilities for the election, the county clerk and recorder shall give to the governing body estimates of the costs for conducting a coordinated election or a mail ballot election so that the governing body may choose the appropriate method of election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1413, § 55, effective July 1.